Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB544.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Creation of Law in Our Schools Act.Section 2. Display of historical documents relating to foundation of law.The board of school directors of a school district and the administrators of a charter school shall display, in each of their respective school buildings occupied by students, a copy of the following documents:(1) The Ten Commandments.(2) The Declaration of Independence.(3) The Constitution of the United States.(4) The Constitution of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.123456789101112131415161718 Section 3. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0544PN0569 - 2 - 12